Utah statutes.
78B-6-209.   Dispute Resolution Restricted Account -- Appropriation.

There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Dispute Resolution Account."  Three dollars of the fees established in Subsections 78A-2-301(1)(a) through (e), (1)(g), and (1)(s) shall be allocated to and deposited in the restricted account.  The Legislature shall annually appropriate money from the Dispute Resolution Account to the Administrative Office of the Courts to implement the purposes of the Alternative Dispute Resolution Act.

